Hawaii, session 2025, GM1130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all
collective bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated
with the exclusive representative of collective bargaining units
(1) and (10) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $12,932,847 $28,525,268
Special funds $2,722,472 $6,007,929
Federal funds $1,653,577 $3,650,401
Other federal funds $101,822 $225,082
Interdepartmental transfers $26,380 $58,343
Revolving funds $68,611 $151,745
Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the
department of education:
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO 1

Page 2 H.B. NO. h T i
C.D. 1
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $2,618,782 $5,776,819
Special funds $301 $664
Federal funds $1,304,170 $2,878,023
Other federal funds $722 $1,597
SECTION 2. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART II
SECTION 3. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representative of collective bargaining units (1) and (10):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $322,740 $713,206
SECTION 4. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO 2
MIIHIilllllilllinH

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PART III
SECTION 5. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary
increases and other cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and employees who
are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the same
compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining units (1) and (10):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $840,588 $1,852,647
Special funds $14,761 $32,645
Federal funds $7,149 $15,811
Other federal funds $1,604 $3,548
Revolving funds $2,414 $5,339
Of the above amounts, the following amounts are for the
department of education:
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $507,162 $1,118,404
Special funds $318 $703
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO

Page 4
H.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
SECTION 6. Funds appropriated or authorized by this part
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year
for the purposes of this part.
PART IV
SECTION 7. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below to administration (JUD 601) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other
cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, by the chief justice for state officers and employees
who are excluded from collective bargaining and belong to the
same compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining units (1) and (10):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $2,060 $4,557
SECTION 8. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
expended by the chief justice in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART V
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO. JS'i
C.D. 1
SECTION 9. There are authorized from the source of funding
indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation - corporate
office (HTH 210) the following sums or so much thereof as may be
necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the collective
bargaining cost items in the agreement negotiated with the
exclusive representative of collective bargaining units (1) and
(10) who is assigned to the Hawaii health systems corporation;
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Special funds $2,707,925 $5,983,018
SECTION 10. Funds authorized by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems
corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART VI
SECTION 11. There are authorized from the source of
funding indicated below to Hawaii health systems corporation -
corporate office (HTH 210) the following sums or so much thereof
as may be necessary to fund for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the
salary increases and other cost adjustments authorized by
chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for state officers and
employees who are excluded from collective bargaining, assigned
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO 5
iiiJiHiiiJiiiiiiiiilinMtii'i

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
to the Hawaii health systems corporation, and belong to the same
compensation plans as those officers and employees within
bargaining units (1) and (10):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
Special funds $74,957 $165,782
SECTION 12. Funds authorized by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the Hawaii health systems
corporation for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
PART VII
SECTION 13. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 all collective bargaining cost
items in the agreement negotiated with the exclusive
representatives of collective bargaining units (1) and (10) :
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General funds $4,920,474 $10,302,319
SECTION 14. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO
iniiiiMiiiiiiiiiiiiiw

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
Part VIII
SECTION 15. There are appropriated from the source of
funding indicated below health premium payments (BUF 761) the
following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund
for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 the salary increases and other
cost adjustments authorized by chapter 89C, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, for state officers and employees who are excluded from
collective bargaining and belong to the same compensation plans
as those officers and employees within collective bargaining
units (1) and (10):
FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
General' funds $23,352 $49,275
SECTION 16. Funds appropriated by this part shall be
allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate state
departments for expenditure in the respective fiscal year for
the purposes of this part.
Part IX
SECTION 17. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO

Page 8 1027
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds.
SECTION 18. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, and
June 30, 2027, of the respective fiscal years, shall lapse as of
those dates.
SECTION 19. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3462 HB1027 CDl HMSO 8

1027
H.B. NO
T
W
O
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 12th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1027, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1027, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
167